Nevada, session 83, SB262-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 269.0242 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
269.0242 Any ordinance enacted pursuant to NRS 269.024
must include provisions in substance as follows:
1. The citizens’ advisory council must consist of not fewer than
three nor more than five members.
2. Each member of the advisory council must be [a] :
(a) A resident [and qualified elector in] of the town [.] ; and
(b) A citizen of the United States or lawfully entitled to reside
in the United States.
3. The members of the advisory council must be appointed by
the board of county commissioners from a list of a number of
qualified persons, equal in number to the number of positions on the
advisory council which are to be filled, elected at an informal
election. Notice of the election must be posted in accordance with
NRS 241.020. The election must be held in the town in November
of the year of the general election.
4. The list of names of the persons elected must be presented to
the board of county commissioners at their first meeting in
December of the year of the general election. The persons appointed
to the advisory council shall serve their respective terms at the
pleasure of the board.
5. The members of the advisory council first appointed by the
board of county commissioners shall serve until the 1st Monday in
January following the next general election, and thereafter the terms
-
*SB262_R1*

– 3 –
of office of the members of the advisory council are for 2 years and
begin on the 1st Monday in January following each general election.
6. The advisory council shall assist the board of county
commissioners in governing the town by acting as liaison between
the residents of the town and the board. The advisory council and
the board shall cooperate to inform each other of all matters of
interest to the town and its residents. The advisory council shall not
expend or contract any town money for any purpose.
7. The members of the advisory council shall serve without
compensation.
Sec. 2. NRS 269.576 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.576 1. Except as appointment may be deferred pursuant
to NRS 269.563, the board of county commissioners of any county
whose population is 700,000 or more shall, in each ordinance which
establishes an unincorporated town pursuant to NRS 269.500 to
269.625, inclusive, provide for:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [7,] 8,
appointment by the board of county commissioners or the election
by the registered voters of the unincorporated town of three or five
[qualified electors who are residents of the unincorporated town]
persons to serve as the town advisory board. If the ordinance
provides for appointment by the board of county commissioners, in
making such appointments, the board of county commissioners shall
consider:
(1) The results of any poll conducted by the town advisory
board; and
(2) Any application submitted to the board of county
commissioners by persons who desire to be appointed to the town
advisory board in response to an announcement made by the town
advisory board.
(b) A term of 2 years for members of the town advisory board.
(c) Election of a chair from among the members of the town
advisory board for a term of 2 years, and, if a vacancy occurs in the
office of chair, for the election of a chair from among the members
for the remainder of the unexpired term. The ordinance must also
provide that a chair is not eligible to succeed himself or herself for a
term of office as chair.
2. Each member of a town advisory board described in
subsection 1 must be:
(a) If the board of county commissioners has, pursuant to NRS
269.580, designated one or more of the services enumerated in
NRS 269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory
board to manage:
(1) A resident of the unincorporated town; and
(2) A qualified elector.
-
*SB262_R1*

– 4 –
(b) If the board of county commissioners has not, pursuant to
NRS 269.580, designated one or more of the services enumerated
in NRS 269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory
board to manage:
(1) A resident of the unincorporated town; and
(2) A citizen of the United States or lawfully entitled to
reside in the United States.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [7,] 8, the
members of a town advisory board serve at the pleasure of the board
of county commissioners.
[3.] 4. If a vacancy occurs on the town advisory board, the
board of county commissioners shall appoint a new member to serve
out the remainder of the unexpired term of the member.
[4.] 5. The board of county commissioners shall provide notice
of the expiration of the term of a member of and any vacancy on a
town advisory board to the residents of the unincorporated town by
mail, newsletter or newspaper at least 30 days before the expiration
of the term or filling the vacancy.
[5.] 6. The duties of the town advisory board are to:
(a) Assist the board of county commissioners in governing the
unincorporated town by acting as liaison between the residents of
the town and the board of county commissioners; and
(b) Advise the board of county commissioners on matters of
importance to the unincorporated town and its residents.
[6.] 7. The board of county commissioners may provide by
ordinance for compensation for the members of the town advisory
board.
[7.] 8. If an unincorporated town is established in a county
whose population is 700,000 or more and is located 25 miles or
more from an incorporated city whose population is 500,000 or
more:
(a) The board of county commissioners shall by ordinance
provide for the election by the registered voters of the
unincorporated town of three or five [qualified electors who are
residents of the unincorporated town] persons to serve as the town
advisory board. If there are fewer [qualified electors who are]
residents of the unincorporated town who file for election to the
town advisory board than there are seats on the town advisory
board, the board of county commissioners shall appoint as many
new members as are necessary to fill the seats left vacant after the
election.
(b) The members of the town advisory board of the
unincorporated town do not serve at the pleasure of and may not be
removed by the board of county commissioners.
-
*SB262_R1*

– 5 –
9. Each member of a town advisory board described in
subsection 8 must be:
(a) If the board of county commissioners has, pursuant to NRS
269.580, designated one or more of the services enumerated in
NRS 269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory
board to manage:
(1) A resident of the unincorporated town; and
(2) A qualified elector.
(b) If the board of county commissioners has not, pursuant to
NRS 269.580, designated one or more of the services enumerated
in NRS 269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory
board to manage:
(1) A resident of the unincorporated town; and
(2) A citizen of the United States or lawfully entitled to
reside in the United States.
Sec. 3. NRS 269.577 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.577 1. The board of county commissioners of any county
whose population is less than 700,000 shall, in each ordinance
which establishes an unincorporated town pursuant to NRS 269.500
to 269.625, inclusive, provide for:
(a) The appointment by the board of county commissioners or
the election by the people of three or five [qualified electors who are
residents of the unincorporated town] persons to serve as the town
advisory board.
(b) The removal of a member of the town advisory board if the
board of county commissioners finds that the removal of the
member is in the best interest of the residents of the unincorporated
town.
(c) The appointment by the board of county commissioners of a
member to serve the unexpired term of a member of the town
advisory board removed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b)
or whose position otherwise becomes vacant.
2. Each member of a town advisory board must be:
(a) If the board of county commissioners has, pursuant to NRS
269.580, designated one or more of the services enumerated in
NRS 269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory
board to manage:
(1) A resident of the unincorporated town; and
(2) A qualified elector.
(b) If the board of county commissioners has not, pursuant to
NRS 269.580, designated one or more of the services enumerated
in NRS 269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory
board to manage:
(1) A resident of the unincorporated town; and
-
*SB262_R1*

– 6 –
(2) A citizen of the United States or lawfully entitled to
reside in the United States.
3. The board of county commissioners may provide by
ordinance for compensation for the members of the town advisory
board.
[3.] 4. The duties of the town advisory board are to:
(a) Assist the board of county commissioners in governing the
unincorporated town by acting as liaison between the residents of
the town and the board of county commissioners; and
(b) Advise the board of county commissioners on matters of
importance to the unincorporated town and its residents.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.165
and 293.166, a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a
primary election unless the person named has filed a declaration of
candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid the filing fee
required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than:
(a) For a candidate for judicial office, the first Monday in
January of the year in which the election is to be held and not later
than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in January;
and
(b) For all other candidates, the first Monday in March of the
year in which the election is to be held and not later than 5 p.m. on
the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
(a) For partisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ..................................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the ................ Party nomination for
the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed to
constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed
to constructive, residence in the State, district, county,
township, city or other area prescribed by law to which the
office pertains began on a date at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
-
*SB262_R1*

– 7 –
candidacy for this office; that my telephone number is
............, and the address at which I receive mail, if different
than my residence, is .........; that I am registered as a member
of the ................ Party; that I am a qualified elector pursuant
to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada; that if I have ever been convicted of treason or a
felony, my civil rights have been restored; that I have not, in
violation of the provisions of NRS 293.176, changed the
designation of my political party or political party affiliation
on an official application to register to vote in any state since
December 31 before the closing filing date for this election;
that I generally believe in and intend to support the concepts
found in the principles and policies of that political party in
the coming election; that if nominated as a candidate of the
................ Party at the ensuing election, I will accept that
nomination and not withdraw; that I will not knowingly
violate any election law or any law defining and prohibiting
corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and elections in
this State; that I will qualify for the office if elected thereto,
including, but not limited to, complying with any limitation
prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this State
concerning the number of years or terms for which a person
may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly and
willfully filing a declaration of candidacy which contains a
false statement is a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor
and also subjects me to a civil action disqualifying me from
entering upon the duties of the office; and that I understand
that my name will appear on all ballots as designated in this
declaration.

................................................................
(Designation of name)

................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

(b) [For] Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), for
nonpartisan office:
-
*SB262_R1*

– 8 –
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ..................................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of ................, I, the
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at
........., in the City or Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive, residence
in the State, district, county, township, city or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is ..........., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..........; that I
am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that if nominated as a nonpartisan candidate at the
ensuing election, I will accept the nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number of
years or terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

................................................................
(Designation of name)

................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
-
*SB262_R1*

– 9 –
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

(c) For the position of town advisory board if the board of
county commissioners has not, pursuant to NRS 269.580,
designated one or more of the services enumerated in NRS
269.575 as properly within the power of the town advisory board to
manage:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
POSITION OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ..................................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the position of ................, I, the
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside
at ........., in the Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive,
residence in the town to which the position pertains began
on a date at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of
the close of filing of declarations of candidacy for this
position; that my telephone number is ..........., and the
address at which I receive mail, if different than my
residence, is ..........; that if nominated as a nonpartisan
candidate at the ensuing election, I will accept the
nomination and not withdraw; that I will not knowingly
violate any election law or any law defining and prohibiting
corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and elections
in this State; that I will qualify for the position if elected
thereto, including, but not limited to, complying with any
limitation prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this
State concerning the number of years or terms for which a
person may hold the position; that I understand that
knowingly and willfully filing a declaration of candidacy
which contains a false statement is a crime punishable as a
gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a civil action
disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of the
-
*SB262_R1*

– 10 –
position; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

................................................................
(Designation of name)

................................................................
(Signature of candidate for position)


Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. The address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to his or her
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
-
*SB262_R1*

– 11 –
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the proof of identity
and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to subsection 3 or
4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the filing officer for the office or
position, as applicable, as his or her agent for service of process for
the purposes of a proceeding pursuant to NRS 293.182. Service of
such process must first be attempted at the appropriate address as
specified by the candidate in the declaration of candidacy. If the
candidate cannot be served at that address, service must be made by
personally delivering to and leaving with the filing officer duplicate
copies of the process. The filing officer shall immediately send, by
registered or certified mail, one of the copies to the candidate at the
specified address, unless the candidate has designated in writing to
the filing officer a different address for that purpose, in which case
the filing officer shall mail the copy to the last address so
designated.
7. If the filing officer receives credible evidence indicating that
a candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the filing officer:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the Attorney General, if the filing officer is the
Secretary of State, or to the district attorney, if the filing officer is a
person other than the Secretary of State.
8. The receipt of information by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to subsection 7 must be treated as a
challenge of a candidate pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS
293.182 to which the provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
-
*SB262_R1*

– 12 –
9. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB262_R1*